ro-RO: Tip de lungime a colierului: Choker; Guler; Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Princess; Rope; În formă de Y; Altele
hr-HR: Vrsta duljine ogrlice: Ogrlica uz vrat (choker); Ovratnik (collar); Lariat (laso); Matinee; Opera; Princess; Uže (rope); Y-oblik; Ostalo
pl: Typ długości naszyjnika: Choker; Kolia; Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Princess; Sznur; W kształcie litery Y; Inne
ru: Тип длины ожерелья: Чокер; Коллар; Лариат; Матине; Опера; Принцесса; Роуп; Y-образное; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de comprimento do colar: Gargantilha; Coleira; Lariat; Matiné; Ópera; Princesa; Corda; Em forma de Y; Outro
nl: Lengtecategorie ketting: Choker; Collier; Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Prinses; Touw; Y-vormig; Anders
da: Længdetype for halsskæde: Choker; Collar; Lariat; Matiné; Opera; Prinsesse; Rope; Y-formet; Andet
es: Tipo de longitud del collar: Gargantilla; Collar; Lazo; Matiné; Ópera; Princesa; Cuerda; En forma de Y; Otro
bg-BG: Тип дължина на огърлицата: Чокър; Яка; Лариат; Матине; Опера; Принцеса; Въже; Y-образно; Друго
fi: Kaulakorun pituustyyppi: Choker; Kaulus; Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Princess; Köysi; Y-muotoinen; Muu
el: Τύπος μήκους κολιέ: Τσόκερ; Κολάρο; Lariat; Ματινέ; Όπερα; Πριγκίπισσα; Σχοινί; Σχήματος Υ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ dĺžky náramku: Choker; Golierový (Collar); Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Princess; Rope; V tvare Y; Iné
fr: Type de longueur de collier: Ras de cou; Collier; Lariat; Matinée; Opéra; Princesse; Corde; En Y; Autre
zh-CN: 项链长度类型: 颈圈; 项圈; 套索项链; 马天尼型项链; 歌剧型项链; 公主型项链; 绳索项链; Y 形项链; 其他
it: Tipo di lunghezza della collana: Girocollo; Collare; Lariat; Matinée; Opera; Princess; Corda; A Y; Altro
tr: Kolye uzunluk tipi: Tasma kolye; Yaka kolye; Lariat; Matine; Opera; Prenses; İp; Y şeklinde; Diğer
sv: Typ av halsbandslängd: Choker; Collar; Lariat; Matiné; Opera; Prinsess; Rep; Y-format; Övrigt
ko: 목걸이 길이 타입: 초커; 칼라; 래리어트; 마티네; 오페라; 프린세스; 로프; Y자형; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta dolžine ogrlice: Ovratnica (choker); Ovratnik; Lariat; Matinée; Opera; Princess; Vrv (rope); V obliki črke Y; Drugo
zh-TW: 項鍊長度類型: 頸鍊; 衣領鍊; 套索鍊; 馬天尼鍊; 歌劇鍊; 公主鍊; 長繩鍊; Y 字鍊; 其他
nb: Type halskjedelengde: Choker; Halsbånd; Lariat; Matiné; Opera; Prinsesse; Rope; Y-formet; Annet
lt-LT: Vėrinio ilgio tipas: Prie kaklo prigludęs; Apykaklės tipo; Lariato; Matinė; Operos; Princesės; Virvės tipo; Y formos; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de comprimento do colar: Gargantilha / Choker; Coleira / Collar; Gravatinha; Matinê; Ópera; Princesa; Corda; Formato em Y; Outro
de: Halskettenlänge: Choker; Collar; Lariat; Matinée; Opera; Prinzessin; Rope; Y-förmig; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทความยาวสร้อยคอ: โชคเกอร์; คอลลาร์; ลาริเอต; มาตินี; โอเปร่า; ปรินเซส; เชือก; รูปตัวY; อื่นๆ
hu: Nyaklánc hosszának típusa: Choker; Gallér; Lariat; Matiné; Opera; Princess; Rope; Y alakú; Egyéb
cs: Délka náhrdelníku: Choker; Obojek; Lariat; Matiné; Opera; Princess; Rope; Ve tvaru Y; Ostatní
en: Necklace length type: Choker; Collar; Lariat; Matinee; Opera; Princess; Rope; Y-shaped; Other
vi: Loại chiều dài dây chuyền: Choker; Vòng cổ sát cổ (Collar); Dây thòng lọng (Lariat); Dài ngang ngực (Matinee); Dài ngang bụng (Opera); Dài ngang xương quai xanh (Princess); Dài qua rốn (Rope); Hình chữ Y; Khác
ja: ネックレス長さタイプ: チョーカー; カラー; ラリエット; マチネ; オペラ; プリンセス; ロープ; Y字型; その他